Utah statutes.
16-10a-820.   Meetings.

(1)  The board of directors may hold regular or special meetings in or out of this state.

(2)  Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, the board of directors may permit any or all directors to participate in a regular or special meeting by, or conduct the meeting through the use of, any means of communication by which all directors participating may hear each other during the meeting.  A director participating in a meeting by this means is considered to be present in person at the meeting.

